Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,106
Use of underground stored water; authorized.

Any person may use water stored incidentally or intentionally underground for which the appropriate permits have not been obtained or for which approval of fees has not been obtained pursuant to section 46-2,101.

Laws 1983, LB 198, § 20.